Hawaii statutes.
§322-29 Comptroller to make improvements,
when. The board shall transmit a copy of its decision to the comptroller
and to the other persons affected thereby, so far as practicable, and in case
the owner of the land does not within ten days after the receipt of the
decision begin work upon the improvements, or in case the work is not completed
within such additional time as has been specified as provided in section
322-23, the comptroller may proceed to make or complete the improvement
according to the decision of the board. In case no appeal is taken from the
decision of the board as above provided, or work is not begun and completed
within the times prescribed, the comptroller may proceed to make or complete
the improvements. [L 1896, c 61, §6; am L 1911, c 112, §7; RL 1925, §983; RL
1935, §1333; RL 1945, §2724; RL 1955, §47-28; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS
§322-29]

Case Notes

Owner may object to methods under proper circumstances, and
extra cost must be assumed by owner. 22 H. 327. See 33 H. 199.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next